Colorado, session 2026A, HB1185.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-109, amend
(2) introductory portion, (2)(h), (2)(i), (3)(a), and (9); and add (2)(j) as
follows:
24-33.5-109. Cold case task force - creation - rules - repeal.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(2) The task force shall consist CONSISTS of sixteen members, as
follows THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(h) Two representatives from victims' families who shall be ARE
appointed by the president of the senate; and
(i) A forensic pathologist who is appointed by the governor; AND
(j) ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL WHO IS APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR AND HAS SPECIFIC KNOWLEDGE AND EXPERIENCE IN RELEVANT
EMERGING TECHNOLOGIES.
(3) (a) The members of the task force appointed pursuant to
subsections (2)(c) to (2)(i) (2)(j) of this section shall serve terms of three
years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than a
minimum majority of the appointed members' terms expire in the same year.
(9) (a) This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2026
SEPTEMBER 1, 2039.
(b) Before its repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall
review the task force in accordance with section 24-34-104 SECTION
2-3-1203.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, repeal
(27)(a)(X) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(27) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2026:
(X) The cold case task force created in section 24-33.5-109;
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1203, add (27) as
follows:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1185

2-3-1203. Sunset review of advisory committees - legislative
declaration - definition - repeal.
(27) (a) THE FOLLOWING STATUTORY AUTHORIZATIONS FOR THE
DESIGNATED ADVISORY COMMITTEES WILL REPEAL ON SEPTEMBER 1, 2039:
(I) THE COLD CASE TASK FORCE CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-109.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2041.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1185

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1185